Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
B. Voting

§ 17-19-720.
Members' list for meeting.

After fixing a record date for a notice of a meeting, a corporation shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names of all its members who are entitled to notice of the meeting. The list shall show the address and number of votes each member is entitled to vote at the meeting. The corporation shall prepare on a current basis through the time of the membership meeting a list of members, if any, who are entitled to vote at the meeting, but not entitled to notice of the meeting. This list shall be prepared on the same basis and be part of the list of members.

The list of members shall be available for inspection by any member for the purpose of communication with other members concerning the meeting, beginning two (2) business days after notice is given of the meeting for which the list was prepared and continuing through the meeting, at the corporation’s principal office or at a reasonable place identified in the meeting notice in the city where the meeting will be held. A member, a member’s agent or attorney is entitled on written demand to inspect and, subject to the limitations of W.S. 17-19-1602(c) and

17-19-1605

, to copy the list, at a reasonable time and at the member’s expense, during the period it is available for inspection.

The corporation shall make the list of members available at the meeting, and any member, a member’s agent or attorney is entitled to inspect the list at any time during the meeting or any adjournment.

If the corporation refuses to allow a member, a member’s agent or attorney to inspect the list of members before or at the meeting, or copy the list as permitted by subsection (b) of this section, the district court of the county where a corporation’s principal office, or if none in this state, its registered office is located, on application of the member, may summarily order the inspection or copying at the corporation’s expense and may postpone the meeting for which the list was prepared until the inspection or copying is complete and may order the corporation to pay the member’s costs, including reasonable counsel fees, incurred to obtain the order.

Unless a written demand to inspect and copy a membership list has been made under subsection (b) of this section prior to the membership meeting and a corporation improperly refuses to comply with the demand, refusal or failure to comply with this section does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting.

The articles or bylaws of a religious corporation may limit or abolish the rights of a member under this section to inspect and copy any corporate record.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-721.
Voting entitlement generally.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, each member is entitled to one (1) vote on each matter voted on by the members.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, if a membership stands of record in the names of two (2) or more persons, their acts with respect to voting shall have the following effect:

If only one (1) votes, such act binds all; and

If more than one (1) votes, the vote shall be divided on a pro rata basis.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-722.
Quorum requirements.

Unless this act, the articles or bylaws provide for a higher or lower quorum, ten percent (10%) of the votes entitled to be cast on a matter shall be represented at a meeting of members to constitute a quorum on that matter.

A bylaw amendment to decrease the quorum for any member action may be approved by the members or, unless prohibited by the bylaws, by the board.

A bylaw amendment to increase the quorum required for any member action shall be approved by the members.

Unless one-third (1/3) or more of the voting power is present in person or by proxy, the only matters that can be voted upon at an annual or regular meeting of members are those matters that are described in the meeting notice.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-723.
Voting requirements.

Unless this act, the articles or the bylaws require a greater vote or voting by class, if a quorum is present, the affirmative vote of the votes represented and voting (which affirmative votes also constitute a majority of the required quorum) is the act of the members.

A bylaw amendment to increase or decrease the vote required for any member action shall be approved by the members.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-724.
Proxies.

As used in this act and in this section:

“Appointment” means the grant of authority to vote;

“Appointment form” means the document appointing the proxy;

“Proxy” means the person to whom the authority to vote is granted.

Unless the articles or bylaws prohibit or limit proxy voting, a member may appoint a proxy to vote or otherwise act for the member by signing an appointment form either personally or by an attorney-in-fact.

An appointment of a proxy is effective when received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes. An appointment is valid for eleven (11) months unless a different period is expressly provided in the appointment form; provided however that no proxy shall be valid for more than three (3) years from its date of execution.

An appointment of a proxy is revocable by the member.

The death or incapacity of the member appointing a proxy does not affect the right of the corporation to accept the proxy’s authority unless notice of the death or incapacity is received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises authority under the appointment.

Appointment of a proxy is revoked by the person appointing the proxy:

Attending any meeting and voting in person; or

Signing and delivering to the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate proxy votes either a writing stating that the appointment of the proxy is revoked or a subsequent appointment form.

Subject to W.S.

17-19-727

and any express limitation on the proxy’s authority appearing on the face of the appointment form, a corporation is entitled to accept the proxy’s vote or other action as that of the member making the appointment.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-725.
Cumulative voting for directors.

If the articles or bylaws provide for cumulative voting by members, members may so vote, by multiplying the number of votes the members are entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom they are entitled to vote, and cast the product for a single candidate or distribute the product among two (2) or more candidates.

Cumulative voting is not authorized at a particular meeting unless:

The meeting notice or statement accompanying the notice states that cumulative voting will take place; or

A member gives notice during the meeting and before the vote is taken of the member’s intent to cumulate votes, and if one (1) member gives this notice all other members participating in the election are entitled to cumulate their votes without giving further notice.

A director elected by cumulative voting may be removed by the members without cause if the requirements of W.S.

17-19-808

are met unless the votes cast against removal, or not consenting in writing to removal, would be sufficient to elect the director if voted cumulatively at an election at which the same total number of votes were cast (or, if such action is taken by written ballot, all memberships entitled to vote were voted) and the entire number of directors authorized at the time of the director’s most recent election were then being elected.

Members shall not cumulatively vote if the directors and members are identical.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-726.
Other methods of electing directors.

A corporation may provide in its articles or bylaws for election of directors by members or delegates:

On the basis of chapter or other organizational unit;

By region or other geographic unit;

By preferential voting; or

By any other reasonable method.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-19-727.
Corporation's acceptance of votes.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment corresponds to the name of a member, the corporation if acting in good faith is entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the member.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment does not correspond to the record name of a member, the corporation if acting in good faith is nevertheless entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the member if:

The member is an entity and the name signed purports to be that of an officer or agent of the entity;

The name signed purports to be that of an attorney-in-fact of the member and if the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory’s authority to sign for the member has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment;

Two (2) or more persons hold the membership as cotenants or fiduciaries and the name signed purports to be the name of at least one (1) of the coholders and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the coholders; and

In the case of a mutual benefit corporation:

The name signed purports to be that of an administrator, executor, guardian or conservator representing the member and, if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the member, and, if the corporation requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment.

The corporation is entitled to reject a vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment if the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of the signature on it or about the signatory’s authority to sign for the member.

The corporation and its officer or agent who accepts or rejects a vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section are not liable in damages to the member for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment under this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

In the case where a member is an entity or where approval is required by a third party which is an entity, the corporation is entitled to accept the vote provided the individual who casts the vote for the entity presents the corporation with a written resolution or other written authorization to vote for the entity.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.